Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) For services provided
by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs ...................... $ 6,029,137
(2) For payments to counties
pursuant to ORS 406.462 ........... $ 1,874,183
(3) For payments to veterans’
service organizations
pursuant to ORS 406.310 ........... $ 122,646
(4) For debt service ........................ $ 2,249,440
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated  from the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, for the following purposes:
(1) For services provided
by the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs ...................... $ 11,506,599
(2) For payments to counties
pursuant to ORS 406.462 ........... $ 7,166,509
(3) For payments to veterans’
service organizations
pursuant to ORS 406.310 ........... $ 477,354
SECTION 3.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$104,611,079 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account, but  excluding lottery funds and fed-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5538 (SB 5538-A) Page 1
eral funds, collected or received  by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs for administration,
grants and services supplied to veterans.
(2) This section does not limit expenditures from the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking
Account for purposes described in section 5 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,525,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Veterans’
Affairs.
SECTION 5. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs for the following purposes are not limited:
(1) Debt service;
(2) Professional services and related costs associated directly with bond sales;
(3) Loans to veterans; and
(4) Payments on behalf of borrowers for  property taxes, city liens, fire insurance, mort-
gage cancellation insurance and repairs to and miscellaneous charges for  borrower-owned
property that are charged to the loan account and repaid along with the payment  of loan
interest and principal.
SECTION 6.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate June 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5538 (SB 5538-A) Page 2